Hawaii, session 2026, HB1103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 338-14.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§338-14.5  Copies of certificate; fees.  The fees for certified copies of birth, marriage, divorce, or death certificates issued by the department of health shall consist of $10 for the first copy issued and $4 for each copy issued thereafter.  These fees shall be collected for each single request for certified copies.  All fees received for the issuance of certified copies of birth, marriage, divorce, or death certificates shall be remitted to the director of health. Upon the receipt of remittances under this section, the director of health shall deposit: (1)  $1 for each certified copy to the credit of the spouse and child abuse special fund established under section 346-7.5; (2)  $1 for each certified copy to the credit of the spouse and child abuse special account established under section 601-3.6; (3)  $1 for each certified copy to the credit of the domestic violence and sexual assault special fund established under section 321-1.3; and (4)  [$1] The remainder of the fee for each certified copy to the credit of the vital statistics improvement special fund established under section 338-14.6[; and (5)  The remainder of the fee for each certified copy to the credit of the state general fund]." SECTION 2.  Section 338-14.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c) The fund shall consist of fees remitted pursuant to section 338-14.5[.] and section 572-5.  All realizations of the fund shall be subject to the conditions specified in subsection (b)." SECTION 3.  Section 572-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows: "(a)  The department of health shall appoint, and at its pleasure remove, one or more suitable persons as agents authorized to grant marriage licenses under this chapter in each judicial circuit.  The agents may issue licenses from any state facility when deemed necessary by the director.  Any agent appointed under this subsection and receiving an application for a marriage license shall collect from the applicant for the license $60, of which the agent, except those provided for in subsection (b), shall retain $9 for the agent's benefit and compensation and shall remit $51 to the director of health. Upon the receipt of remittances under this subsection, the director of health shall deposit: (1)  $32 for each license issued to the credit of the general fund of the State; (2)  $4.50 for each license issued to the credit of the spouse and child abuse special fund established under section 346-7.5; (3)  $4.50 for each license issued to the credit of the spouse and child abuse special account established under section 601-3.6; and (4)  $10 for each license issued to the credit of the [birth defects special fund established under section 321-426.] vital statistics improvement special fund established under section 338-14.6. (b)  The department may appoint, as regular employees under the civil service and classification laws, the number of suitable persons as agents authorized to grant marriage licenses for whom provision has been made in the general appropriation act.  In the case of these agents, the full amount collected from applicants shall be remitted to the director of health. Upon the receipt of remittances under this subsection, the director of health shall deposit: (1)  $41 for each license issued to the credit of the general fund of the State; (2)  $4.50 for each license issued to the credit of the spouse and child abuse special fund established under section 346-7.5; (3)  $4.50 for each license issued to the credit of the spouse and child abuse special account established under section 601-3.6; and (4)  $10 for each license issued to the credit of the [birth defects special fund established under section 321-426.] vital statistics improvement special fund established under section 338-14.6." SECTION 4.  Section 321-426, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. ["[§321-426]  Birth defects special fund.  There is established within the state treasury the birth defects special fund to be administered and expended by the department of health, into which shall be deposited fees remitted pursuant to section 572-5.  Moneys in the special fund shall be used for the payment of the operating expenses of the birth defects program."] SECTION 5.  Any unencumbered and unexpended balance existing as of the effective date of this Act in the birth defects special fund established under section 321-426, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be deposited into the vital statistics improvement special fund, established under section 338-14.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 6.  There is appropriated out of the vital statistics improvement special fund the sum of $__________ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the operations of the vital statistics program, including the operations of the marriage license office of the department of health. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 7.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 8.  This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST